Florida, session 2026, HB353.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
456.0301, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
456.0301 Requirement for instruction on controlled
substance prescribing.—
(1)(a) The appropriate board shall require each person
registered with the United States Drug Enforcement
Administration and authorized to prescribe controlled substances
pursuant to 21 U.S.C. s. 822 to complete a board-approved 2-hour
continuing education course on prescribing controlled substances
offered by a statewide professional association of physicians in
this state that is accredited to provide educational activities
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb353-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 353 2026
designated for the American Medical Association Physician's
Recognition Award Category 1 Credit or the American Osteopathic
Category 1-A continuing medical education credit as part of
biennial license renewal. The course must include information on
the current standards for prescribing controlled substances,
particularly opiates; alternatives to these standards;
nonpharmacological therapies; prescribing emergency opioid
antagonists; and the risks of opioid addiction following all
stages of treatment in the management of acute pain; and the
treatment of pain for patients with sickle cell disease. The
course may be offered in a distance learning format and must be
included within the number of continuing education hours
required by law. The department may not renew the license of any
prescriber registered with the United States Drug Enforcement
Administration to prescribe controlled substances who has failed
to complete the course. The course must be completed by January
31, 2019, and at each subsequent renewal. This paragraph does
not apply to a licensee who is required by his or her applicable
practice act to complete a minimum of 2 hours of continuing
education on the safe and effective prescribing of controlled
substances.
Section 2. Section 456.0311, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
456.0311 Requirements for instruction on sickle cell
disease.—
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb353-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 353 2026
(1)(a) The appropriate board shall require each person
licensed or certified under chapter 458, chapter 459, or part I
of chapter 464 to complete one 2-hour continuing education
course, approved by the board, on sickle cell disease care
management as part of the first licensure or certification
renewal. The course shall consist of education specific to
sickle cell disease and sickle cell traits, including, but not
limited to, evidence-based treatment protocols for patients of
all ages, continuing patient and family education, periodic
comprehensive evaluations and other disease-specific health
maintenance services, psychosocial care, genetic counseling, and
pain management.
(b) Each licensee or certificateholder shall submit
confirmation of having completed such course on a form provided
by the appropriate board when submitting fees for the first
renewal.
(c) The board may approve additional equivalent courses
that may be used to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (a).
Each licensing board that requires a licensee to complete an
educational course pursuant to this section may include the hour
required for completion of the course in the total hours of
continuing education required by law for such profession unless
the continuing education requirements for such profession
consist of fewer than 30 hours biennially.
(d) Any person holding two or more licenses subject to the
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb353-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 353 2026
provisions of this section may show proof of having taken one
board-approved course to satisfy the requirements of paragraph
(a) for purposes of relicensure or recertification for
additional licenses.
(e) Failure to comply with the requirements of this
section shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action under
each respective practice act and under s. 456.072(1)(k). In
addition to discipline by the appropriate board, the licensee
shall be required to complete the course required under this
section.
(2) Each appropriate board may adopt rules to implement
this section.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb353-00